Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.364

Joint higher education committee—Meetings—Reimbursement—Rules—Staffing.

(1) The joint higher education committee shall meet at least twice annually after the conclusion of the legislative session.

(2) The members of the joint higher education committee shall serve without additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending meetings of the joint higher education committee.

(3) The joint higher education committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its operations.

(4) Staff support for the joint higher education committee must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

[ 2012 c 229 s 203.]